Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-145
Motor vehicle used as taxi or limousine; disclosure on face of certificate of title required.

For any motor vehicle which is to be used as a taxi or limousine, the application and the certificate of title shall show on the face thereof that such vehicle is being used or has been used as a taxi or limousine and such subsequent certificates of title shall show the same information.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 45;

Laws 2007, LB286, § 10.